Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-614
Licensee; solicitor; citation; power to issue subpoenas; depositions.

In the preparation for and the conduct of a hearing held pursuant to section 45-613, the board may issue subpoenas to require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of any pertinent records, papers, books, and documents and may administer oaths, examine witnesses, and take any evidence it deems pertinent to a proper determination of the charge. The party against whom such citation is issued shall have the right to obtain from the Secretary of State subpoenas for witnesses such party may desire to have at such hearing. Depositions may be taken and used at such hearings the same as taken and used in civil actions in the district courts of this state. Witnesses so subpoenaed shall receive the same fees as witnesses in the district courts of this state.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 18, p. 1600;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,175;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 14.